Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-188
Credential; discipline; hearing; time; place.

Upon presentation of the petition to the director, he or she shall make an order fixing the time and place for the hearing, which shall not be less than thirty nor more than sixty days thereafter.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 52, p. 468;

C.S.1929, § 71-607;

R.S.1943, § 71-153;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 383;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-153;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 306;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 88.